Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.210, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. Scholarship Subject to paragraph âbâ , scholarship awards paid pursuant to this section shall not exceed the resident tuition rate established for institutions of higher learning under the control of the state board of regents . If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for purposes of this section is insufficient to provide scholarships to all national guard members who apply for the program and who are determined by the adjutant general to be eligible for the program, the adjutant general shall, in coordination with the commission, determine the distribution of scholarships. However, scholarship awards paid pursuant to this section and shall not be less than fifty percent of the resident tuition rate established for institutions of higher learning under the control of the state board of regents or fifty percent of the tuition rate at the institution attended by the national guard member, whichever is lower. Neither eligibility nor scholarship award determinations shall be based upon a national guard memberâs unit, the location at which drills are attended, or whether the eligible individual is a member of the Iowa army or air national guard. House File 118, p. 2 b. Scholarship awards paid pursuant to this section shall not exceed the difference between the tuition rate at the institution attended by the national guard member less any financial aid the national guard member receives under 10 U.S.C. Â§2007. c. If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for purposes of this section is insufficient to provide scholarships to all national guard members who apply for the program and who are determined by the adjutant general to be eligible for the program, the adjutant general shall, in coordination with the commission, determine the distribution of scholarships. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 118, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor